Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 7
CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this article was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of this article for 1980 and 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For election offenses relating to conduct of elections, see part 7 of article 13 of this title.

Section

PART 1 HOURS OF VOTING, REGISTRATION, OATHS, AND ASSISTANCE TO VOTE

PART 2 PRIMARY ELECTIONS

PART 3 PAPER BALLOTS

PART 4 VOTING MACHINES

PART 5 ELECTRONIC VOTING EQUIPMENT

PART 6 ELECTION RETURNS

PART 7 DELIVERY OF ELECTION RETURNS

PART 8 PRESERVATION OF BALLOTS AND ELECTION RECORDS

PART 9 BALLOT ISSUE NOTICES

PART 10 RANKED VOTING METHODS